Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB886.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1107. Prerelease briefings on veterans benefits.Prior to the release from a State correctional institution of an inmate who is a veteran, the department shall conduct a briefing with the inmate to explain and share information relating to Federal and State benefits available to veterans and veterans' families and how to apply for the benefits.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415